District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.01

Property Clerk office created; definitions.

(a)

There shall be an office of the Metropolitan Police District known as the Office of the Property Clerk. The Property Clerk shall be a member of the Metropolitan Police force. The staff shall consist of civilians who are not members of the Metropolitan Police force, except that police officers may provide security for lost, stolen, or abandoned property held by the office.

(b)

For purposes of §§ 5-119.02 through 5-119.10 and §§ 5-119.12 through 5-119.18:

(1)

The term “lost property” means any personal property, tangible or intangible, except a motor vehicle, the owner of which is unknown and which has been casually or involuntarily parted with through negligence, carelessness, or inadvertence.

(2)

The term “finder of lost property” means any person other than a public officer of the Metropolitan Police Department who has found lost property.

R.S., D.C., § 408
Dec. 5, 1919, 41 Stat. 363, ch. 1, § 1
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 201, 27 DCR 5150
Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 6(a), 36 DCR 4575
May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-118, § 2, 37 DCR 1736

History

Public or government held property, see § 41-112.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 5-119.19.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 4-152.
1973 Ed., § 4-151.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 8-24, the “D.C. Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Removal Amend. Act of 1989”, see Mayor’s Order 90-11, January 23, 1990.

Delegation of Authority